pt-BR: Capacidade de empilhar: Não empilhável; Empilhável; Outro
hr-HR: Mogućnost slaganja: Ne može se slagati; Može se slagati; Ostalo
sv: Stapelbarhet: Ej stapelbar; Stapelbar; Annat
zh-TW: 可堆疊性: 不可堆疊; 可堆疊; 其他
en: Stackability: Non-stackable; Stackable; Other
nb: Mulighet til stabling: Kan ikke stables; Kan stables; Annet
vi: Khả năng xếp chồng: Không thể xếp chồng; Có thể xếp chồng; Khác
da: Stabelbarhed: Ikke-stabelbar; Stabelbar; Andet
bg-BG: Възможност за подреждане едно върху друго: Не може да се слага едно върху друго; Може да се слага едно върху друго; Друго
zh-CN: 堆叠性: 不可堆叠; 可叠放; 其他
cs: Stohovatelnost: Nestohovatelné; Stohovatelné; Jiné
ru: Возможность штабелирования: Одиночного размещения; Модульный; Другое
fi: Pinottavuus: Ei pinottava; Pinottava; Muu
tr: İstiflenebilirlik: İstiflenemez; İstiflenebilir; Diğer
pl: Możliwość układania w stosy: Niesztaplowane; Sztaplowane; Inne
sk-SK: Stohovateľnosť: Nestohovateľný; Stohovateľný; Iné
el: Δυνατότητα στοίβαξης: Μη στοιβαζόμενο; Στοιβαζόμενο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Posibilitatea de stivuire: Fără posibilitate de stivuire; Superpozabil; Altele
es: Apilabilidad: No apilable; Apilable; Otros
it: Impilabilità: Non impilabile; Impilabile; Altro
th: ความสามารถในการวางซ้อน: เชื่อมต่อเป็นกลุ่มไม่ได้; วางซ้อนกันได้; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Krovimo galimybė: Nekomplektuojama; Komplektuojama; Kita
de: Stapelbarkeit: Nicht stapelbar; Stapelbar; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Empilhabilidade: Não empilhável; Empilhável; Outro
sl-SI: Možnost zlaganja: Ni mogoče zlagati; Zložljiva ena na drugo; Druga
ja: 積み重ね可能: 積み重ね不可; 積み重ね可能; その他
ko: 적층 가능 여부: 비적층형; 적층형; 기타
nl: Stapelbaarheid: Niet stapelbaar; Stapelbaar; Overig
hu: Rakásolhatóság: Nem egymásra rakható; Egymásra rakható; Egyéb
fr: Possibilité d’empilement: Non empilable; Empilable; Autre